North Carolina, session 2025, HB757.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of thirty-one thousand dollars ($31,000) in nonrecurring funds
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to Joyful Soul Treasures, Inc., a nonprofit
organization, to assist the organization with its "Safe Haven for Safe Sex" project, which is a
campaign aimed at enhancing sexual health education and awareness among adolescents aged 13
through 18. The initiative focuses on empowering young people with essential knowledge and
skills, reducing stigma and misconceptions regarding sexual health.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H757-v-1*